Florida, session 2026, SB1614.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 8 9 Section 1.âParagraph (a) of subsection (7) of section 10 553.80, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 11 553.80âEnforcement.â 12 (7)(a)âThe governing bodies of local governments may 13 provide a schedule of reasonable fees, as authorized by s. 14 125.56(2) or s. 166.222 and this section, for enforcing this 15 part. These fees, and any fines or investment earnings related 16 to the fees, may only be used for carrying out the local 17 governmentâs responsibilities in enforcing the Florida Building 18 Code, including, but not limited to, any process or enforcement 19 related to obtaining or finalizing a building permit. When 20 providing a schedule of reasonable fees, the total estimated 21 annual revenue derived from fees, and the fines and investment 22 earnings related to the fees, may not exceed the total estimated 23 annual costs of allowable activities. Any unexpended balances 24 must be carried forward to future years for allowable activities 25 or must be refunded at the discretion of the local government. A 26 local government may not carry forward an amount exceeding the 27 average of its operating budget for enforcing the Florida 28 Building Code for the previous 4 fiscal years. For purposes of 29 this subsection, the term âoperating budgetâ does not include 30 reserve amounts. Any amount exceeding this limit must be used as 31 authorized in subparagraph 2. However, a local government that 32 established, as of January 1, 2019, a Building Inspections Fund 33 Advisory Board consisting of five members from the construction 34 stakeholder community and carries an unexpended balance in 35 excess of the average of its operating budget for the previous 4 36 fiscal years may continue to carry such excess funds forward 37 upon the recommendation of the advisory board. The basis for a 38 fee structure for allowable activities must relate to the level 39 of service provided by the local government and must include 40 consideration for refunding fees due to reduced services based 41 on services provided as prescribed by s. 553.791, but not 42 provided by the local government. Fees charged must be 43 consistently applied. 44 1.âAs used in this subsection, the phrase âenforcing the 45 Florida Building Codeâ includes the direct costs and reasonable 46 indirect costs associated with review of building plans, 47 building inspections, reinspections, and building permit 48 processing; building code enforcement; and fire inspections 49 associated with new construction. The phrase may also include 50 training costs associated with the enforcement of the Florida 51 Building Code and enforcement action pertaining to unlicensed 52 contractor activity to the extent not funded by other user fees. 53 2.âA local government must use any excess funds that it is 54 prohibited from carrying forward to rebate and reduce fees, to 55 upgrade technology hardware and software systems to enhance 56 service delivery, to pay for the construction of a building or 57 structure that houses a local governmentâs building code 58 enforcement agency, or for training programs for building 59 officials, inspectors, or plans examiners associated with the 60 enforcement of the Florida Building Code. Excess funds used to 61 construct such a building or structure must be designated for 62 such purpose by the local government and may not be carried 63 forward for more than 4 consecutive years. An owner or a builder 64 who has a valid building permit issued by a local government for 65 a fee, or an association of owners or builders located in this 66 the state which that has members with valid building permits 67 issued by a local government for a fee, may bring a civil action 68 against the local government that issued the permit for a fee to 69 enforce this subparagraph. 70 3.âThe following activities may not be funded with fees 71 adopted for enforcing the Florida Building Code: 72 a.âPlanning and zoning or other general government 73 activities not related to obtaining a building permit. 74 b.âInspections of public buildings for a reduced fee or no 75 fee. 76 c.âPublic information requests, community functions, 77 boards, and any program not directly related to enforcement of 78 the Florida Building Code. 79 d.âEnforcement and implementation of any other local 80 ordinance, excluding validly adopted local amendments to the 81 Florida Building Code and excluding any local ordinance directly 82 related to enforcing the Florida Building Code as defined in 83 subparagraph 1. 84 4.âA local government must use recognized management, 85 accounting, and oversight practices to ensure that fees, fines, 86 and investment earnings generated under this subsection are 87 maintained and allocated or used solely for the purposes 88 described in subparagraph 1. 89 5.âThe local enforcement agency, independent district, or 90 special district may not require at any time, including at the 91 time of application for a permit, the payment of any additional 92 fees, charges, or expenses associated with: 93 a.âProviding proof of licensure under chapter 489; 94 b.âRecording or filing a license issued under this chapter; 95 c.âProviding, recording, or filing evidence of workersâ 96 compensation insurance coverage as required by chapter 440; or 97 d.âCharging surcharges or other similar fees not directly 98 related to enforcing the Florida Building Code. 99 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.